District of Columbia statutes.
32-215

Limitations on employment in stuffing, sale and distribution of newspapers; exercise of trades in streets; exception for distribution of political literature.

No minor under 16 years of age shall be employed in the stuffing of newspapers, nor shall the work of any minor 16 or 17 employed stuffing newspapers exceed 40 hours in any 1 week, nor shall such minor be employed on more than 1 night in any week. No minor under 12 years of age shall distribute, sell, expose, or offer for sale any newspapers, magazines, periodicals, or any other articles or merchandise of any description, or distribute handbills or circulars, except political literature as specified below, in any street or public place, or exercise the trade of bootblack or any other trade, in any street or public place; provided, that the provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to minors 10 years of age and over engaged in the distribution of newspapers, magazines, or periodicals on fixed routes; provided further, that no minor under 16 years of age shall be employed or permitted or suffered to work at any of the trades or occupations mentioned in this section, in any street or public place, after 7:00 p.m. or before 6:00 a.m., or, unless holding a work permit issued in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, during the hours when such minor’s school is in session. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the distribution or circulation, by a minor, of political literature or petitions, or such other materials, for which the minor receives no pecuniary compensation.

History

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1003, ch. 908, § 17
renumbered as § 15 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(18), 23 DCR 522

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-201, § 32-202, § 32-216, § 32-217, § 32-218, § 32-219, and § 32-220.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-515.
1973 Ed., § 36-217.